Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1587.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 25-1587.01 to 25-1587.09 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act.

Laws 1993, LB 458, § 1.

While Nebraska courts are prohibited from reviewing the merits of a foreign judgment, Nebraska courts may examine whether the foreign judgment was rendered with proper jurisdiction and may refuse to register and enforce a foreign judgment rendered without jurisdiction over the parties or the subject matter. Walksalong v. Mackey, 250 Neb. 202, 549 N.W.2d 384 (1996).